Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-134
Standards; review; filing; availability.

The standards established pursuant to section 68-133 and all amendments to such standards shall be reviewed by the county on a biennial basis to insure that such standards reflect changes in living standards and costs-of-living. A copy of all standards and amendments to such standards shall be filed with the Department of Health and Human Services within thirty days after their adoption by the county. Upon request of a county board, the Department of Health and Human Services shall assist the board in developing standards or amendments. Each county shall make a copy of its standards and amendments available for public inspection during normal business hours.

Laws 1983, LB 604, § 4;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 290.